Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.311

Primaries.

Primaries for general elections to be held in November, and the election of precinct committee officers, must be held on the first Tuesday of the preceding August.

[ 2011 c 349 s 2; 2006 c 344 s 1; 2004 c 271 s 105.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 349: See note following RCW 29A.04.255.

Effective date—2006 c 344 ss 1-16 and 18-40: "Sections 1 through 16 and 18 through 40 of this act take effect January 1, 2007." [ 2006 c 344 s 41.]